Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.240

Secretary of state—Primary returns—State offices, etc.

The secretary of state shall, as soon as possible but in any event not later than seventeen days following the primary, canvass and certify the returns of all primary elections as to candidates for statewide offices, United States senators and representatives in Congress, and all legislative and judicial candidates whose district extends beyond the limits of a single county.

[ 2013 c 11 s 64; 2011 c 349 s 22; 2003 c 111 s 1524; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 97; 1965 c 9 s 29.62.100. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 11; prior: 1907 c 209 s 24, part; RRS s 5201, part. Formerly RCW 29.62.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.